Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.120

ESD board—Return to seven member board.

Any educational service district board which elects under RCW 28A.310.050 to increase the size of the educational service district board from seven to nine members, after at least four years, may elect by resolution of the board to return to a membership of seven educational service board members. In such case, at the next election a new board consisting of seven educational service board members shall be elected in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1990 c 33 s 273; 1977 ex.s. c 283 s 21; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 9; 1974 ex.s. c 75 s 8; 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 4. Formerly RCW 28A.21.035.]

NOTES:

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 283: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 75: See note following RCW 28A.310.030.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 282: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.